Utah statutes.
11-14-301.   Issuance of bonds by governing body -- Computation of
indebtedness under constitutional and statutory limitations.
(1)  If the governing body has declared the bond proposition to have carried
and no contest has been filed, or if a contest has been filed and favorably
terminated, the governing body may proceed to issue the bonds voted at the
election.
(2)  It is not necessary that all of the bonds be issued at one time, but
bonds approved by the voters may not be issued more than 10 years after the
date of the election.
(3) (a)  Bonds approved by the voters may not be issued to an amount that will
cause the indebtedness of the local political subdivision to exceed that
permitted by the Utah Constitution or statutes.
(b)  In computing the amount of indebtedness that may be incurred pursuant to
constitutional and statutory limitations, the constitutionally or statutorily
permitted percentage, as the case may be, shall be applied to the fair market
value, as defined under Section 59-2-102, of the taxable property in the local
political subdivision, as computed from the last applicable equalized
assessment roll before the incurring of the additional indebtedness.
(c)  In determining the fair market value of the taxable property in the local
political subdivision as provided in this section, the value of all tax
equivalent property, as defined in Section 59-3-102, shall be included as a
part of the total fair market value of taxable property in the local political
subdivision, as provided in Title 59, Chapter 3, Tax Equivalent Property Act.
(4)  Bonds of improvement districts issued in a manner that they are payable
solely from the revenues to be derived from the operation of the facilities of
the district may not be included as bonded indebtedness for the purposes of
the computation.
(5)  Where bonds are issued by a city, town, or county payable solely from
revenues derived from the operation of revenue-producing facilities of the
city, town, or county, or payable solely from a special fund into which are
deposited excise taxes levied and collected by the city, town, or county, or
excise taxes levied by the state and rebated pursuant to law to the city,
town, or county, or any combination of those excise taxes, the bonds shall be
included as bonded indebtedness of the city, town, or county only to the
extent required by the Utah Constitution, and any bonds not so required to be
included as bonded indebtedness of the city, town, or county need not be
authorized at an election, except as otherwise provided by the Utah
Constitution, the bonds being hereby expressly excluded from the election
requirement of Section 11-14-201.
(6)  A bond election is not void when the amount of bonds authorized at the
election exceeded the limitation applicable to the local political subdivision
at the time of holding the election, but the bonds may be issued from time to
time in an amount within the applicable limitation at the time the bonds are
issued.
